New York, session 2025-2026, S8782.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 471 of the real property tax law, as added by a 2 chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the real property tax law relating 3 to establishing a real property tax exemption for surviving spouses of 4 police officers killed in the line of duty, as proposed in legislative 5 bills numbers S. 683-a and A. 3729, is amended by adding a new subdivi- 6 sion 6 to read as follows: 7 6. Application for such exemption shall be filed with the assessor on 8 or before the taxable status date on a form prescribed by the commis- 9 sioner. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 11 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025, amending the real property tax 12 law relating to establishing a real property tax exemption for surviving 13 spouses of police officers killed in the line of duty, as proposed in 14 legislative bills numbers S. 683-a and A. 3729, takes effect. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02742-05-6